Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 5. Office and Agent

§ 17-16-501.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each corporation shall continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

; and

A registered agent as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

.

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2008, 90, § 3.

The provisions of W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

shall apply to all corporations.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, §§ 2, 3.

The 2008 amendment,

by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by rewriting (a)(i) and (a)(ii), in part by repealing (a)(ii)(A) through (C), relating to registered agents; and inserting (b).

Editor's notes. —

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.

Default judgment where notice served on secretary of state. —

The district court does not err in failing to set aside a default judgment for mistake, inadvertence, surprise or excusable neglect even though the defaulting party, a Wyoming corporation, had no actual notice of the lawsuit, where the plaintiff properly served notice, in accordance with Rule 4(d)(4), W.R.C.P., and the state corporation laws, on the secretary of state when it was determined that the defendant, in violation of the corporation laws, had failed to maintain both a registered office and a registered agent. U.S. Aviation, Inc. v. Wyoming Avionics, Inc., 664 P.2d 121,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Patel v. Cwcapital Asset Mgmt., Llc, 2010 WY 147, 242 P.3d 1015,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Nov. 16, 2010).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety and effect of corporation's appearance pro se through agent who is not attorney, 8 ALR5th 653.

§§ 17-16-502 through 17-16-509.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 3

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1, related to changes of registered office or
registered agent.